Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 3403.
Director; functions.

The Director shall:

Provide general information to applicants for licensure as acupuncturists.

Collect fees as provided under this chapter.

Explain appeal procedures to licensed acupuncturists and applicants and complaint procedures to the public.

Receive applications for licensure, license applicants under this chapter, renew licenses, and revoke, reinstate, or condition licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer.

Refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer.

The Director may adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 39;

2019, No. 30

, § 23.

§ 3404.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two licensed acupuncturists to serve as advisors in matters relating to acupuncture as set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129b

.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint two licensed acupuncturists to serve as advisors in matters relating to acupuncture as set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129b

.

Appointees shall have at least three years’ experience as an acupuncturist immediately preceding appointment and shall be actively engaged in the practice of acupuncture in Vermont during incumbency.

The Director shall seek the advice of the acupuncturist advisors in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 49(b);

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2019, No. 30

, § 23.